Utah statutes.
61-2e-401.   Division authority -- Immunity.

(1) (a)  In addition to a power or duty expressly provided in this chapter, the division may:

(i)  receive and act on a complaint including:

(A)  taking action designed to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter, including the issuance of a cease and desist order if the person against whom the order is issued is given the right to petition the board for review of the order; or

(B)  commencing an administrative or judicial proceeding on the division's own initiative;

(ii)  investigate an entity required to be registered under this chapter, regardless of whether the entity is located in Utah; and

(iii)  employ one or more investigators, clerks, or other employees or agents if:

(A)  approved by the executive director; and

(B)  within the budget of the division.

(b)  A failure to respond to a request by the division in an investigation under this chapter is considered to be a separate violation of this chapter, including:

(i)  failing to respond to a subpoena;

(ii)  withholding evidence; or

(iii)  failing to produce a document or record.

(2) (a)  If a person is found to have violated this chapter or a rule made under this chapter, the person shall pay the costs incurred by the division to copy a book, paper, contract, document, or record required under this chapter, including the costs incurred to copy an electronic book, paper, contract, document, or record in a universally readable format.

(b)  If a person fails to pay the costs described in Subsection (2)(a) when due, the person's registration is automatically suspended:

(i)  beginning the day on which the payment of costs is due; and

(ii)  ending the day on which the costs are paid.

(3)  The division is immune from a civil action or criminal prosecution for initiating or assisting in a lawful investigation of an act or participating in a disciplinary proceeding under this chapter if the division takes the action:

(a)  without malicious intent; and

(b)  in the reasonable belief that the action is taken pursuant to the powers and duties vested in the division under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2012 General Session

